Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Spouse or Children Unprovided for in Wills.

Sec. 13.12.301.
Entitlement of spouse; premarital will.

If a testator’s surviving spouse married the testator after the testator executed the testator’s will, the surviving spouse is entitled to receive, as an intestate share, no less than the value of the share of the estate the surviving spouse would have received if the testator had died intestate as to that portion of the testator’s estate, if any, that neither is devised to a child of the testator who was born before the testator married the surviving spouse and who is not a child of the surviving spouse nor is devised to a descendant of such a child or passes under AS

13.12.603

or

13.12.604

to such a child or to a descendant of such a child, unless

it appears from the will or other evidence that the will was made in contemplation of the testator’s marriage to the surviving spouse;

the will expresses the intention that it is to be effective notwithstanding a subsequent marriage; or

the testator provided for the spouse by transfer outside the will and the intent that the transfer be in lieu of a testamentary provision is shown by the testator’s statements or is reasonably inferred from the amount of the transfer or other evidence.

In satisfying the share provided by this section, devises made by the will to the testator’s surviving spouse, if any, are applied first, and other devises, other than a devise to a child of the testator who was born before the testator married the surviving spouse and who is not a child of the surviving spouse or a devise or substitute gift under AS

13.12.603

or

13.12.604

to a descendant of the child, abate as provided in AS

13.16.540

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

Sufficiency of provision for, or reference to, prospective spouse to avoid lapse or revocation of will by subsequent marriage. 38 ALR4th 117.

Sec. 13.12.302.
Omitted children.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, if a testator fails to provide in the testator’s will for the testator’s children born or adopted after the execution of the will, the omitted after-born or after-adopted child receives a share in the estate as follows:

if the testator did not have a child living when the testator executed the will, an omitted after-born or after-adopted child receives a share in the estate equal in value to that which the child would have received had the testator died intestate, unless the will devised all or substantially all of the estate to the other parent of the omitted child and that other parent survives the testator and is entitled to take under the will;

if the testator had one or more children living when the testator executed the will, and the will devised property or an interest in property to one or more of the then living children, an omitted after-born or after-adopted child is entitled to share in the testator’s estate as follows:

the portion of the testator’s estate in which the omitted after-born or after-adopted child is entitled to share is limited to devises made to the testator’s then living children under the will;

the omitted after-born or after-adopted child is entitled to receive the share of the testator’s estate, as limited in (A) of this paragraph, that the child would have received had the testator included all omitted after-born and after-adopted children with the children to whom devises were made under the will and had given an equal share of the estate to each child;

to the extent feasible, the interest granted an omitted after-born or after-adopted child under this section must be of the same character, whether equitable or legal, or present or future, as that devised to the testator’s then living children under the will;

in satisfying a share provided by this paragraph, devises to the testator’s children who were living when the will was executed abate ratably; in abating the devises of the then living children, the court shall preserve to the maximum extent possible the character of the testamentary plan adopted by the testator.

Neither (a)(1) nor (a)(2) of this section applies if

it appears from the will that the omission was intentional; or

the testator provided for the omitted after-born or after-adopted child by transfer outside the will and the intent that the transfer be in lieu of a testamentary provision is shown by the testator’s statements or is reasonably inferred from the amount of the transfer or other evidence.

If at the time of execution of the will the testator fails to provide in the testator’s will for a living child solely because the testator believes the child to be dead, the child is entitled to share in the estate as if the child were an omitted after-born or after-adopted child.

In satisfying a share provided by (a)(1) of this section, devises made by the will abate under AS

13.16.540

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)